english.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl

! define Lexicon;

! define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s;

! define Grammar Lexicon .o. EInsertion;

! regex Grammar;

LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Verb ;

LEXICON Noun
cat Ninf;

LEXICON Verb
watch Vinf;

LEXICON Ninf
+N+Sg:0 #;
+N+Pl:^s #;

LEXICON Vinf
+V:0 #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s #;
+V+Past:^ed #;
+V+PastPart:^ed #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
